Hawaii statutes.
§205A-32 Penalties. (a) Any person
who violates any provision of part II or part III shall be liable as follows:

(1) For a civil fine not to exceed $100,000; or

(2) For the cost of returning the affected
environment or ecology within the coastal management area to the condition
existing before the violation.

(b) In addition to any other penalties, any
person who is violating any provision of part II or part III shall be liable
for a civil fine not to exceed $10,000 a day for each day in which such violation
persists.

(c) Any civil fine or other penalty provided
under this section may be imposed by the circuit court or may be imposed by the
department after an opportunity for a hearing under chapter 91. Imposition of
a civil fine shall not be a prerequisite to any civil fine or other injunctive
relief ordered by the circuit court. [L 1975, c 176, pt of §1; am L 1989, c
356, §9; am L 2001, c 169, §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next